District of Columbia statutes.
40-204

Permission to examine hospital records.

Any person or persons, firm or firms, corporation or corporations legally liable for such lien or against whom a claim shall be asserted for compensation for such injuries, shall be permitted to examine the ledger entries and similar records of any such association, corporation, or other institution or body, and of any agency of the United States or the District of Columbia, maintaining such hospital for the purpose of ascertaining the basis for such lien.

June 30, 1939, 53 Stat. 991, ch. 255, § 4
June 19, 1948, 62 Stat. 496, ch. 525, § 3
1981 Ed., § 38-304.
1973 Ed., § 38-304.